Oklahoma, session 2025, SB726.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 3629, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3629. A. An insurer shall furnish, upon written
request of any insured claiming to have a loss under an insurance
contract issued by such insurer, forms of proof of loss for
completion by such person, but such insurer shall not, by reason of
the requirement so to furnish forms, have any responsibility for or
with reference to the completion of such proof or the manner of any
such completion or attempted completion.
B. It shall be the duty of the insurer, receiving a proof of
loss, to submit a written offer of settlement or rejection of the
claim to the insured within sixty (60) days of receipt of that proof
of loss. Upon a judgment rendered to either party, costs and
attorney fees shall be allowable to the prevailing party. For
ENGR. S. B. NO. 726 Page 1

purp oses of this section, the prevailing party is the insurer in
those cases where judgment does not exceed written offer of
settlement. In all other judgments the insured shall be the
prevailing party. If the insured is the prevailing party, the court
in rendering judgment shall add interest on the verdict at the rate
of fifteen percent (15%) per year from the date the loss was payable
pursuant to the provisions of the contract to the date of the
verdict. This provision shall not apply to uninsured motorist
coverage or property insurance as defined in Section 704 of this
title.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
Passed the Senate the 24th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives




ENGR. S. B. NO. 726 Page 2